Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2220
Area agency on aging; duties.

An area agency on aging shall:

(1) Monitor, evaluate, and comment on policies, programs, hearings, and community actions which affect older individuals;

(2) Conduct public hearings, studies, and assessments on the needs of older individuals living in the planning-and-service area;

(3) Represent the interests of older individuals to public officials and to public and private agencies or organizations;

(4) Cooperate, coordinate, and plan with other agencies, organizations, or individuals to promote benefits and opportunities for older individuals consistent with the goals of the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, as such federal act existed on January 1, 2016;

(5) Develop an area plan and budget pursuant to section 81-2213 for a comprehensive, coordinated program of community aging services needed by older individuals of the area and consistent with the requirements of the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, as such federal act existed on January 1, 2016;

(6) Monitor and evaluate the activities of service providers to ensure that the services being provided comply with the terms of the grant or contract. When a provider is found to be in breach of the terms of its grant or contract, the area agency on aging shall enforce the terms of the grant or contract;

(7) Comply with rules, regulations, and requirements of the department which have been developed in consultation with the area agencies on aging for client and fiscal information and provide to the department information necessary for federal and state reporting, program evaluation, program management, fiscal control, and research needs; and

(8) Provide technical assistance to service providers as needed, prepare written monitoring reports, and provide written reports of onsite assessments of all service providers funded by the area agency on aging according to the rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 20;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 22;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 31.